Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.765

Manufacturing—Regional strategies—Grants.

(1) The department must support the development of regionally tailored strategies to facilitate the continued existence and development of [a] manufacturing workforce across the state.

(2) To support regional manufacturing cluster development and job creation, the department must grant any funding provided in RCW 43.330.767 for initiatives that accelerate the development of regional clusters intended to grow living wage jobs in manufacturing and research and development.

(3) The department is encouraged to consider the creation of regional offices or establishing additional duty stations that facilitate sector leads to be located in the regions most dependent on their sector.

[ 2021 c 64 s 4.]

NOTES:

Short title—2021 c 64: See note following RCW 43.330.760.